Mississippi, session 20261E, SB2003.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  In addition to all other sums appropriated to the agency, the following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Department of Human Services for the purpose of defraying expenses of making renovations, upgrades, and expansion of the Oakley Youth Development Center for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................. ................................................ $12,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  In addition to all other sums appropriated to the agency, the following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Department of Human Services for the purpose of defraying expenses of establishing statewide youth diversion programs under Section 43-21-409 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.............................. $7,500,000.00. SECTION 3.  In addition to all other sums appropriated to the agency, the following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of defraying the expenses of acquiring, renovating, leasing, planning for, and designing additional secured youth detention facilities to house juveniles in North and South Mississippi for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............ $10,000,000.00. SECTION 4.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer from the proper funds upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.